Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201414-2103
Board of directors;
territory outside city; participation in election; filings; where made.

Whenever a metropolitan utilities district is extended to
include sanitary and improvement districts, unincorporated area, towns, villages,
or territory lying outside the corporate limits of cities of the metropolitan
class or so extended as to include sanitary and improvement districts, unincorporated
area, towns, or villages in an adjoining county or counties, then such sanitary
and improvement districts, unincorporated area, towns, or villages shall have
a right to participate in the nomination and in the election of members of
the board of directors of the metropolitan utilities district. The election
commissioner or county clerk of each of the counties in which ballots are
cast pursuant to this section shall within seven days after the election transmit,
by mail or otherwise, to the election commissioner of the county in which
the city of the metropolitan class is located, a copy of the abstract of the
votes cast for members of the board of directors. The election commissioner
shall in due course deliver to the candidate receiving the highest number
of votes a certificate of election as a member of the board of directors.
Any and all filings for such office shall be made with the election commissioner of the county in which the city of the
metropolitan class is located notwithstanding that the person
wishing to file lives in a county adjoining the one in which the city of the
metropolitan class is located.

Laws 1921, c. 109, § 1, p. 385;

C.S.1922, § 3748;

C.S.1929, § 14-1004;

R.S.1943, § 14-1004;

Laws 1961, c. 32, § 2, p. 152;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1004;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 478;

Laws 2014, LB1014, § 2.
July 18, 2014
Election commissioner of Douglas County receives abstract of votes from clerks of adjoining counties as to officers of Metropolitan Utilities District. Barton v. City of Omaha, 180 Neb. 752, 145 N.W.2d 444 (1966).